Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201886-707
Right-of-way; state and federal highways; regulation by Department of Transportation.

If the right to construct, operate, and maintain the telecommunications lines and related facilities is granted along, upon, across, or under a state or federal highway, the location and installation of such lines and related facilities, insofar as they pertain to the present and future use of the right-of-way for highway purposes, is subject to rules and regulations of the Department of Transportation. If the future use of the state or federal highway requires the moving or relocating of the facilities, such facilities shall be removed or relocated by the owner at the owner's cost and expense and as directed by the Department of Transportation except as provided by section 39-1304.02.

Laws 1943, c. 231, § 1, p. 778;

R.S.1943, § 86-303.01;

Laws 1957, c. 171, § 3, p. 592;

Laws 1999, LB 496, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-303.01;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 412;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 296.